src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
novellilooming+N:novˈelʲli%#looming VIRSIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
novellimeister+N:novˈelʲli%#m˘eister%{E%} REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
novelliraamat+N:novˈelʲli%#raamat VIRSIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
novellisari+N:novˈelʲli%#s˘arJ1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@novellist+N:@P.Stem.Nom@novell˘ist TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
novellistika+N:novellˈisʲtika AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
novellitoodang+N:novˈelʲli%#toodang VIRSIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@november+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nov˘ember%{E%} REDEL  "weight: 6 " ; 
novembrikuu+N:nov˘embri%#k˘uu%>%{id%} PUU  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@noviits+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nov˘iits TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@novokaiin+N:@P.Stem.Nom@novoka˘iin TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
nublakas+N:nublaka LOHAKAS  "weight: 11 " ; 
nublu+N:nublu RUBLA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nubuk+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nubuk REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
nubul+N:nubul MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
nudipea+N:nudʲi%#p˘E6A6%>%{id%} PUU  "weight: 11 " ; 
nudisaba+N:nudʲi%#saba%>%{pl.u%}%{rare%}%{stemill%}%{rare%} KAVA  "weight: 11 " ; 
nudism+N:nud˘ism TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
nudistirand+N:nudˈisti%#r˘anD1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nudistus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nudistus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nudisus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nudisus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
nuga+N:nuG1a%>%{pl.e%} KAVA  "weight: 7 " ; 
nugiline+N:nugiline OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
nugiloom+N:nugi%#l˘oom%>%{pl.i%} PIIM  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nugis+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nugis SOOLANE  "weight: 10 " ; 
nugisõna+N:nugi%#sõna%>%{pl.u%} KAVA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nuheldavus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nuheldavus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nuhk+N:@P.Stem.Nom@n˘uhK1 TAUD  "weight: 9 " ; 
nuhkimine+N:n˘uhkimine OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nuhtlus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@n˘uhtlus SUULINE  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nuhtlusseadus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@n˘uhtlus%#s˘eadus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@D.Stem.Guessed@@P.Stem.Nom@nui+N:@D.Stem.Guessed@@P.Stem.Nom@n˘ui%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} PIIM  "weight: 9 " ; 
nukits+N:nukits MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nukk+N:@P.Stem.Nom@n˘ukk TAUD  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nukk+N:@P.Stem.Nom@n˘ukk%>%{pl.e%} KOON  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nukk+N:@P.Stem.Nom@n˘ukk%>%{pl.i%} PIIM  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nukleaas+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nukle˘aas TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
nukleiinhape+N:nukle˘iin%#h˘apP1e PINGE  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nukleon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@n˘ukleon MUUSEUM  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nukleotiid+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nukleot˘iid TAUD  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nukrameelsus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@n˘ukra%#m˘eelsus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nukrus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@n˘ukrus SUULINE  "weight: 9 " ; 
nukrustunne+N:n˘ukrus%#t˘unD1e PINGE  "weight: 11 " ; 
nukuke+N:nukuke PEENIKE  "weight: 11 " ; 
nukuteater+N:nuku%#t˘eater%{E%} REDEL  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nukuvalitsus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nuku%#valitsus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
nulg+N:n˘ulG1%>%{pl.e%} KOON  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@null+N:@P.Stem.Nom@n˘ulʲl TAUD  "weight: 7 " ; 
nullkraad+N:n˘ulʲl%#kr˘aadʲ TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@number+N:@P.Stem.Nom@n˘umber%{E%} REDEL  "weight: 6 " ; 
numbrilaud+N:n˘umbri%#l˘auD1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM  "weight: 11 " ; 
numbrimärk+N:n˘umbri%#m˘ärk TAUD  "weight: 10 " ; 
numbrituba+N:n˘umbri%#tuB1a%>%{pl.e%}%{stemill%} KAVA  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@numeraal+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nˈumer˘aal TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@numeraator+N:@P.Stem.Nom@numer˘aator REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@numeratsioon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@numeratsi˘oon TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@numeroloog+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nˈumerol˘oog TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
numeroloogia+N:numerol˘oogia AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@numismaatik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@numismaatik VIRSIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
numismaatika+N:numismaatika AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nummerdus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nummerdus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
nunn+N:n˘unn%>%{pl.i%}%{rare%} PIIM  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nuntsius+N:@P.Stem.Nom@n˘untsius OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nupp+N:@P.Stem.Nom@n˘upp%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON  "weight: 7 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nuppel+N:@P.Stem.Nom@n˘uppel%{E%} REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
nuppsuu+N:n˘upp%#s˘uuH3Y3%>%{id%}%{stemill%} PUU  "weight: 11 " ; 
nups+N:n˘ups%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON  "weight: 11 " ; 
nupuke+N:nupuke PEENIKE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nupukus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nupukus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
nupumees+N:nupu%#me MEES  "weight: 11 " ; 
nupustik+N:nˈupust˘ik ELANIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nuputus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nuputus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@R.Part.One@nurg+N:@R.Part.One@n˘urG1%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON  "weight: 11 " ; 
nurgake+N:nurgake PEENIKE  "weight: 10 " ; 
nurgakivi+N:nurga%#kivi%>%{pl.e%}%{stemill%}%{rare%} KAVA  "weight: 9 " ; 
nurgalaud+N:nurga%#l˘auD1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM  "weight: 11 " ; 
nurgalöök+N:nurga%#l˘öök TAUD  "weight: 10 " ; 
nurganaine+N:nurga%#naine NAINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
nurgatagune+N:nurga%#tagune SOOLANE  "weight: 10 " ; 
nurgatempel+N:nurga%#t˘empel%{E%} REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
nurgavoodi+N:nurga%#v˘oodʲi AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nurgelisus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nurgelisus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nurgik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nurgik VIRSIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
nurin+N:nurin MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
nuripool+N:nuri%#p˘ool%{stemill%} KEEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
nurisemine+N:nurisemine OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nurisünnitus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nuri%#sünʲnitus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
nurjaminek+N:n˘urja%#minek VIRSIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nurjatus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nurjatus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
nurjumine+N:n˘urjumine OLULINE  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nurk+N:@P.Stem.Nom@n˘urk%>%{pl.i%} PIIM  "weight: 6 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nurm+N:@P.Stem.Nom@n˘urm%>%{pl.i%} EIT  "weight: 9 " ; 
nurmenukk+N:nurme%#n˘ukk%>%{pl.e%} KOON  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nurmik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nurmik VIRSIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
nurmikas+N:nurmika LOHAKAS  "weight: 11 " ; 
nurmkana+N:n˘urm%#kana%>%{pl.u%} KAVA  "weight: 11 " ; 
nurr+N:n˘urr%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON  "weight: 10 " ; 
nurrumine+N:n˘urrumine OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nuss+N:@P.Stem.Nom@n˘usʲs TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nutikus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nutʲikus OLULINE  "weight: 10 " ; 
nutimees+N:nutʲi%#me MEES  "weight: 11 " ; 
nutria+N:n˘utria AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
nuts+N:n˘uts%>%{pl.e%} KOON  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nutsak+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nutsak VIRSIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
nutsakas+N:nutsaka LOHAKAS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nutt+N:@P.Stem.Nom@n˘utʲt TAUD  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nutt+N:@P.Stem.Nom@n˘utt%>%{pl.e%} KOON  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nuttur+N:@P.Stem.Nom@n˘uttur REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
nutuhääl+N:nutu%#h˘ääl%{stemill%} KEEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
nutulaul+N:nutu%#l˘aul%>%{pl.e%} KOON  "weight: 11 " ; 
nutulugu+N:nutu%#luG1u%{stemill%} KAVA  "weight: 11 " ; 
nutuluks+N:nutu%#l˘uks%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON  "weight: 11 " ; 
nutunaine+N:nutu%#naine NAINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
nutupill+N:nutu%#p˘ilʲl TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
nutusilm+N:nutu%#s˘ilm%>%{pl.i%} SILM  "weight: 11 " ; 
nutuvesi+N:nutu%#veS1%{stemill%} MESI  "weight: 11 " ; 
nuubialane+N:n˘uubialane OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
nuubialanna+N:n˘uubialanna PERE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nuudel+N:@P.Stem.Nom@n˘uudel%{E%} REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nuuks+N:@P.Stem.Nom@n˘uuks%>%{pl.e%} KOON  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nuuksatus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nuuksatus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
nuukse+N:n˘uukse PINGE  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nuum+N:@P.Stem.Nom@n˘uum%>%{pl.i%}%{rare%} PIIM  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nuumatavus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nuumatavus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
nuumelajas+N:n˘uum%#elaja LOHAKAS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nuumik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nuumik VIRSIK  "weight: 9 " ; 
nuumlojus+N:n˘uum%#lojus SOOLANE  "weight: 11 " ; 
nuumloom+N:n˘uum%#l˘oom%>%{pl.i%} PIIM  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nuumuvus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@n˘uumuvus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
nuuskija+N:n˘uusʲkija AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nuuskpiiritus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@n˘uusk%#piiritus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
nuusksool+N:n˘uusk%#s˘ool%>%{pl.i%} PIIM  "weight: 11 " ; 
